el: Μέθοδος εφαρμογής καθαριστικού χαλιών: Αφρός και βούρτσισμα; Εφαρμογή σκόνης και σκούπισμα; Σαμπουάν και τρίψιμο; Μούλιασμα και εξαγωγή (σκούπα υγρών/πλυντική); Ψεκασμός και ταμπονάρισμα; Εφαρμογή με πανί; Άλλο
cs: Způsob aplikace čističe na koberce: Pěna a zapracování kartáčem; Posypání práškem a vysátí; Šampon a drhnutí; Namočení a extrakce (vysavač na mokré sání / extraktor); Nastříkání a odsátí; Nanesení hadříkem; Jiné
th: วิธีใช้น้ำยาทำความสะอาดพรม: โฟมและแปรงขัด; โรยผงและดูดฝุ่น; แชมพูและขัด; แช่และดูดออก (เครื่องดูดฝุ่นแบบเปียก/เครื่องสกัด); สเปรย์และซับ; แบบเช็ด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Spôsob použitia prostriedku na čistenie kobercov: Pena a zapracovanie kefou; Posypanie práškom a vysatie; Šampónovanie a drhnutie; Namočenie a extrakcia (tepovač/extraktor); Nastriekanie a odsatie; Nanesenie handričkou; Iné
es: Método de aplicación del limpiador de alfombras: Espuma y cepillado; Espolvoreado y aspirado; Champú y restregado; Remojo y extracción (aspiradora en húmedo/extractor); Rociado y absorción; Aplicación con paño; Otro
zh-CN: 地毯清洁器使用方式: 泡沫刷洗; 撒粉及吸尘; 洗剂擦洗; 浸泡及抽吸（湿式吸尘器/抽洗机）; 喷洒及吸干; 擦拭; 其他
ru: Способ нанесения средства для чистки ковров: Нанесение пены и чистка щеткой; Нанесение порошка и уборка пылесосом; Нанесение шампуня и чистка щеткой; Замачивание и экстракция (моющий пылесос/экстрактор); Распыление и промакивание; Протирание; Другое
nl: Tapijtreiniger toepassingsmethode: Schuimen en inborstelen; Poeder strooien & stofzuigen; Shampoo & schrobben; Weken & opzuigen (waterzuiger/extractor); Spray & deppen; Vegen; Overige
ko: 카펫 클리너 사용 방식: 폼 및 브러시 인; 분말 살포 및 진공 흡입; 샴푸 및 스크럽; 담금 및 추출(건습식 청소기/추출기); 스프레이 및 블로팅; 와이프 온; 기타
da: Påføringsmetode for tæpperenser: Skum og indbørstning; Pulverdrys og støvsugning; Shampoo og skrub; Iblødsætning og udtrækning (vådstøvsuger/ekstraktor); Spray og dup; Aftørring; Andet
bg-BG: Метод за нанасяне на препарат за почистване на килими: Пяна и втриване с четка; Поръсване с прах и почистване с прахосмукачка; Шампоан и търкане; Накисване и извличане (прахосмукачка за мокро почистване/екстрактор); Спрей и попиване; Забърсване; Друго
nb: Metode for tepperenserapp: Skum og børst inn; Strø på pulver og støvsug; Sjampo og skrubb; Bløtlegg og trekk ut (våtstøvsuger/tepperenser); Spray og tørk; Tørk på; Annet
pl: Metoda aplikacji środka do czyszczenia dywanów: Pianka i wcieranie; Posypywanie proszkiem i odkurzanie; Szampon i szorowanie; Namaczanie i odsysanie (odkurzacz piorący/ekstraktor); Rozpylanie i odsączanie; Wycieranie; Inne
lt-LT: Kilimų valiklio naudojimo metodas: Putos ir įtrynimas šepečiu; Miltelių užbarstymas ir siurbimas; Šampūnas ir šveitimas; Mirkymas ir ištraukimas (plaunamuoju siurbliu); Purškimas ir nusausinimas; Užtepamas; Kita
it: metodo con app per la pulizia dei tappeti: Schiuma e spazzolatura; Polvere e aspirazione; Shampoo e strofinamento; Ammollo ed estrazione (aspiraliquidi/estrattore); Spray e tamponamento; Applicazione con panno; Altro
pt-BR: Método de aplicação do limpador de carpetes: Espuma e escovação; Polvilhar em pó e aspirar; Shampoo e esfregação; Embeber e extrair (aspirador de pó e água/extratora); Pulverizar e secar; Aplicação com pano; Outro
sl-SI: Metoda aplikacije čistila za preproge: Pena in vtiravanje s krtačo; Posip prahu in sesanje; Šamponiranje in drgnjenje; Namočenje in ekstrakcija (vodni sesalnik/ekstraktor); Pršenje in pivnanje; Nanos s krpo; Drugo
hu: Szőnyegtisztító alkalmazási módszere: Hab és bekefélés; Porszórás és porszívózás; Samponozás és súrolás; Áztatás és kiszívás (takarítógép/extraháló); Permetezés és felitatás; Áttörléses; Egyéb
de: Anwendungsmethode des Teppichreinigers: Einschäumen und einbürsten; Pulver aufstreuen und absaugen; Shampoonieren und schrubben; Einweichen und extrahieren (Nasssauger/Waschsauger); Aufsprühen und abtupfen; Aufwischen; Sonstige
vi: Phương pháp sử dụng chất tẩy rửa thảm: Bọt và chà bằng bàn chải; Rắc bột và hút bụi; Dầu gội và chà; Ngâm và chiết (máy hút bụi/chiết ướt); Xịt và thấm; Lau; Khác
zh-TW: 地毯清潔劑使用方式: 泡沫並刷入; 灑粉並吸塵; 洗劑並刷洗; 浸泡並抽吸 (乾濕兩用吸塵器/洗地機); 噴灑並按壓吸乾; 擦拭; 其他
hr-HR: Metoda primjene sredstva za čišćenje tepiha: Pjena i četkanje; Posipanje prahom i usisavanje; Šamponiranje i ribanje; Natapanje i ekstrakcija (vodeni usisavač / ekstraktor); Raspršivanje i brisanje tapkanjem; Nanošenje brisanjem; Ostalo
en: Carpet cleaner application method: Foam & brush-in; Powder sprinkle & vacuum; Shampoo & scrub; Soak & extract (wet vac/extractor); Spray & blot; Wipe-on; Other
fi: Mattopesurin sovellusmenetelmä: Vaahto ja harjaus; Jauheen ripottelu ja imurointi; Pesuaine ja hankaus; Liotus ja poisto (märkäimuri/tekstiilipesuri); Suihkutus ja painelu; Pyyhittävä; Muu
pt-PT: Método da aplicação de limpeza de carpetes: Espuma e escovagem; Aplicação de pó e aspiração; Champô e escovagem; Imersão e extração (aspirador de líquidos/extrator); Spray e absorção; Aplicação com pano; Outro
fr: Méthode d’application du nettoyant pour tapis: Mousse et brossage; Saupoudrage et aspiration; Shampoing et récurage; Trempage et extraction (aspirateur à eau/extracteur); Pulvérisation et épongeage; Application au chiffon; Autre
tr: Halı temizleyici uygulama yöntemi: Köpük ve fırçalama; Toz serpme ve vakumlama; Şampuan ve fırçalama; Islatma ve çekme (ıslak vakum/çekici); Sprey ve kurulama; Silerek uygulama; Diğer
ro-RO: Metoda de aplicare a produsului de curățat covoare: Spumă și periere; Pulbere (presărare și aspirare); Șampon și curățare; Înmuiere și extracție (aspirator cu spălare/extractor); Pulverizare și tamponare; Ștergere; Altele
ja: カーペットクリーナー適用方法: フォーム & ブラッシング; パウダー散布 & 吸引; シャンプー & スクラブ; 浸け置き & 抽出 (湿式掃除機/エクストラクター); スプレー & 吸い取り; ワイプオン; その他
sv: Appliceringsmetod för mattrengöring: Skum och inborstning; Strö pulver och dammsug; Schamponera och skrubba; Blötlägg och extrahera (våtdammsugare/textilvårdsmaskin); Spraya och badda; Stryk på; Annat